Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 7 of this 2022 Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Oregon Kratom Consumer Protection Act.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 7 of this 2022 Act:
(1) “Kratom product” means a food, food product,  food ingredient, dietary ingredient,
dietary supplement or beverage  for human consumption containing any part of the leaf of
the plant Mitragyna speciosa.
(2) “Processor” means  a person that sells, distributes or exposes for sale kratom pro-
ducts on a wholesale basis to a retailer.
(3) “Retailer” means a person that sells, distributes or exposes for sale  kratom products
to individuals for personal consumption.
SECTION 3. (1) A processor may not sell, distribute or expose  for sale a kratom product
prior to registering with the Department of Revenue under section 7 of this 2022 Act.
(2) A processor that violates subsection (1) of this section is subject to a civil penalty  of
not more than $500 for the first offense and not more than $1,000 for a second  or subsequent
offense.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by state tax law or the department by  rule or order, a
civil penalty imposed under this section may be appealed as a contested case proceeding un-
der ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 4.
(1) A retailer may not sell, distribute or expose for sale a kratom product
to an individual under 21 years of age.
(2) A retailer that violates subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a  Class C
misdemeanor for each violation.
SECTION 5. The Department of Revenue  shall deposit all moneys collected under
sections 3 and 7 of this 2022 Act in  a suspense account established under ORS 293.445. The
department may pay expenses for the administration and  enforcement of sections 2 to 7 of
this 2022 Act with moneys from the suspense account.  The department shall pay refunds, if
any, with moneys in  the suspense account. Moneys necessary to pay administrative and
enforcement expenses and refunds  are continuously appropriated to the department from the
suspense account.
SECTION 6. Except as  otherwise provided or where the context requires otherwise, the
provisions of ORS chapters 305  and 314 as to the determination and notice of deficiencies,
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 1
assessments, collections, liens,  delinquencies, claims for refund and refunds, stays of col-
lection pending appeal, confidentiality of registration and the  related civil penalties, and the
related procedures, apply to the determination of  civil penalties imposed under section 3 of
this 2022 Act and registration fees imposed under section 7 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 7. (1) The Department of Revenue  shall adopt rules necessary to carry out
sections 2 and 3 of this 2022 Act, including rules establishing:
(a) Procedures for a processor to register  annually with the department, including a re-
quirement that a processor certify that all of the  kratom products the processor will sell,
distribute or expose for sale are third-party tested to  satisfy industry standards for
adulteration;
(b) A reasonable  registration fee to be paid to the department by a processor to support
the administration and enforcement of sections 2 to 7 of this 2022 Act; and
(c) Any other requirements the department deems appropriate.
(2) Fees collected under  subsection (1) of this section may not exceed the cost to ad-
minister and enforce sections 2 to 7 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 8.
(1) Sections 2 to 7 of this 2022 Act become operative on July 1, 2023.
(2) The  Department of Revenue may take any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary to enable the department to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the department by sections 2 to 7 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (4), chapter 441,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  the Business Division, is increased by $195,894 to imple-
ment sections 2 to 7 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 10. This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 2